Hawaii statutes.
§132-9 Submission of building plans for
approval. The county fire chief shall be authorized by each respective
county to require plans or documentation, or both, to show compliance with the
county's adopted fire code for the following:

(1) Construction, alteration, rehabilitation, or
addition to any building, structure, or facility;

(2) Changes in the use of a building or structure, or
a change in occupancy; and

(3) Installation or alteration of any procedures,
equipment, property, or structure for any life safety or fire protection
systems.

No work shall commence without the necessary
permits issued by the jurisdiction having authority.

This section shall be applicable to the State
and the counties, and other municipal subdivisions, and their officers, as well
as to private persons. [L 1945, c 166, §1; RL 1955, §184-10; am L 1963, c 3,
§1; HRS §132-10; am and ren L 1978, c 241, §2(11); gen ch 1985; am L 2013, c
179, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next